src/import/adjectives.lexc
@P.NomStem.First@aetav+A:@P.NomStem.First@´aetav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@andev+A:@P.NomStem.First@´andE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@haisev+A:@P.NomStem.First@h´aisE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@haistev+A:@P.NomStem.First@h´aistE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@heitev+A:@P.NomStem.First@h´eitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@hoidev+A:@P.NomStem.First@h´oidE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@hüüdev+A:@P.NomStem.First@h´üüdE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@jooksev+A:@P.NomStem.First@j´ooksE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@jootev+A:@P.NomStem.First@j´ootE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@jõudev+A:@P.NomStem.First@j´õudE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@jättev+A:@P.NomStem.First@j´ättE2v MAGUS ;
kaheldav+A:kaheldav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kaitsev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´aitsE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kandev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´andE2v MAGUS ;
kardetav+A:kardetav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kartev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´artE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kastev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´astE2v MAGUS ;
kasutatav+A:kasutatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kattev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´attE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@keetev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´eetE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kestev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´estE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kiitev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´iitE2v MAGUS ;
kirjutatav+A:kirjutatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@koitev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´oitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kostev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´ostE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kurtev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´urtE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuulev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´uulE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@köitev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´öitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kündev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´ündE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@küttev+A:@P.NomStem.First@k´üttE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@laitev+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´aitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@laskev+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´askE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@laulev+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´aulE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@leidev+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´eidE2v MAGUS ;
lepitav+A:lepitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@liitev+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´iitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@loitev+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´oitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lootev+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´ootE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõppev+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´õppE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@läitev+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´äitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lüpsev+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´üpsE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@maitsev+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´aitsE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@maksev+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´aksE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@mattev+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´attE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@murdev+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´urdE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@muutev+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´uutE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@mõistev+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´õistE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@mõskev+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´õskE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@mõõtev+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´õõtE2v MAGUS ;
mängitav+A:mängitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@möönev+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´öönE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@naasev+A:@P.NomStem.First@n´aasE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@naerev+A:@P.NomStem.First@n´aerE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@naitev+A:@P.NomStem.First@n´aitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@needev+A:@P.NomStem.First@n´eedE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@niitev+A:@P.NomStem.First@n´iitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@nuttev+A:@P.NomStem.First@n´uttE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@nõudev+A:@P.NomStem.First@n´õudE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@olev+A:@P.NomStem.First@olev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@ostev+A:@P.NomStem.First@´ostE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@paistev+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´aistE2v MAGUS ;
pakutav+A:pakutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@peetav+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´eetav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@peitev+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´eitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@peksev+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´eksE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pesev+A:@P.NomStem.First@pesev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pettev+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´ettE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pistev+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´istE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@puskev+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´uskE2v MAGUS ;
puudutav+A:puudutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@päästev+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´äästE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@püüdev+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´üüdE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@reetev+A:@P.NomStem.First@r´eetE2v MAGUS ;
ristitav+A:ris,titav MAGUS ;
rõhutav+A:rõhutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@saatev+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´aatE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@seadev+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´eadE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@seisev+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´eisE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@suutev+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´uutE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@sõitev+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´õitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@sõudev+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´õudE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@säästev+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´äästE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@sööstev+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´ööstE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@söötev+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´öötE2v MAGUS ;
sünnitav+A:sün,nitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tahtev+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´ahtE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tappev+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´appE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@teadev+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´eadE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@toitev+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´oitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tootev+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´ootE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tundev+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´undE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tõstev+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´õstE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tõusev+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´õusE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@täitev+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´äitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@uhtev+A:@P.NomStem.First@´uhtE2v MAGUS ;
usutav+A:usutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@uttev+A:@P.NomStem.First@´uttE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@veenev+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´eenE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@veetev+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´eetE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vestev+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´estE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@viitev+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´iitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@võidev+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´õidE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@võitev+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´õitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@võttev+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´õttE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@väitev+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´äitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@õitsev+A:@P.NomStem.First@´õitsE2v MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vedav+A:@P.NomStem.First@vedav MAGUS ;
vedelev+A:vedelev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@veerev+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´eerev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@veetav+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´eetav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@veetlev+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´eetlev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vehkiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´ehkiv MAGUS ;
venitatav+A:venitatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@veniv+A:@P.NomStem.First@veniv MAGUS ;
veretav+A:veretav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@verev+A:@P.NomStem.First@verev MAGUS ;
veritsev+A:veritsev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vetruv+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´etruv MAGUS ;
vibreeriv+A:vibr´eeriv MAGUS ;
vihatav+A:vihatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vihjav+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´ihjav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vihkav+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´ihkav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@viibiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´iibiv MAGUS ;
vilisev+A:vilisev MAGUS ;
viljastav+A:vil,jastav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vilkuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´ilkuv MAGUS ;
vingerdav+A:vingerdav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vinguv+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´inguv MAGUS ;
virgutav+A:virgutav MAGUS ;
virvendav+A:virvendav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@visklev+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´isklev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vohav+A:@P.NomStem.First@vohav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vonklev+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´onklev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@voogav+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´oogav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@voolav+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´oolav MAGUS ;
vuhisev+A:vuhisev MAGUS ;
võbelev+A:võbelev MAGUS ;
võbisev+A:võbisev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@võetav+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´õetav MAGUS ;
võidetav+A:võidetav MAGUS ;
võidutsev+A:võidutsev MAGUS ;
võimaldav+A:võimaldav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@võistlev+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´õistlev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@võitlev+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´õitlev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@võiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´õiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@võluv+A:@P.NomStem.First@võluv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@võrdlev+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´õrdlev MAGUS ;
võrreldav+A:võrreldav MAGUS ;
võõrandatav+A:võõrandatav MAGUS ;
võõrastav+A:võõrastav MAGUS ;
